District of Columbia statutes.
32-1653

Funding of students.

Pursuant to § 51-109.01, a student enrolled in an Educational Stepladder program approved course and who maintains a satisfactory level of attendance and achievement in the program and who is:

(1)

Receiving unemployment insurance compensation shall be eligible for an extension of benefits for the duration of the program, up to a maximum amount of 52 times his or her weekly benefit amount, or 100% of the wages for employment paid the individual by employers during his or her base period, whichever is the lesser; this total amount includes regular benefits and any federal extension that may be in effect; or

(2)

Not receiving unemployment insurance compensation may be eligible for a weekly monetary benefit equal to the unemployment insurance compensation weekly benefit amount a person earning minimum wage would receive, to the extent that funds are available, for the duration of the program, up to a maximum of 52 times the calculated weekly benefit.

History

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1154, 51 DCR 8441

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1153 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1153 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).